District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1101

Repealed

Reorganization of corporations existing prior to January 1, 1902.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1316, ch. 854, § 766
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 2, 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(8), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1101.
1981 Ed., § 29-101.
1973 Ed., § 29-101.